Arkansas, session 2025, HB1313.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-1-110 is amended to read as follows:
14-1-110. Coverage for eligible police officer and firefighter
retirees — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "County" means any county in this state;
(2) "Dependent" means a participant or an eligible police
officer retiree's eligible retiree's:
(A) Natural child, stepchild, or adopted child who is
eligible for coverage under a plan of an eligible police officer retiree; and
(B) Spouse who is eligible for coverage under a plan of an
eligible police officer retiree;
(3) "Eligible firefighter retiree" means a firefighter who is:
(A) Employed as a firefighter;
(B)(i) Eligible to retire with full retirement benefits
under:
(a) The Arkansas Local Police and Fire
*ANS126*
01/29/2025 12:57:34 PM ANS126

HB1313
Retirement System under § 24-10-101 et seq.;
(b) A municipal or county retirement benefit
system or plan for employees;
(c) A local firemen's relief and pension fund
under § 24-11-801 et seq.; or
(d) The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement
System under § 24-4-101 et seq.
(ii) As used in this subdivision (a)(3)(B),
“eligible to retire with full retirement benefits” means a firefighter who
is:
(a) Any age with twenty-eight (28) years of
credited service;
(b) At least fifty-five (55) years of age and
has at least twenty (20) years of credited service;
(c) At least sixty (60) years of age and has
at least five (5) years of credited service; or
(d) At least sixty (60) years of age and has
at least ten (10) years of actual Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement
System service credit; and
(C) Not eligible for Medicare enrollment;
(4) "Eligible retiree" means an eligible police officer retiree
or an eligible firefighter retiree;
(5) "Eligible police officer retiree" means a police officer who
is:
(A) Employed as a police officer;
(B)(i) Eligible to retire with full retirement benefits
under:
(a) The Arkansas Local Police and Fire
Retirement System under § 24-10-101 et seq.;
(b) Any municipal or county retirement benefit
system or plan for employees;
(c) Any local policemen's pension and relief
fund under § 24-11-101 et seq.; or
(d) The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement
System under § 24-4-101 et seq.
(ii) As used in this subdivision (a)(3)(B)
01/29/2025 12:57:34 PM ANS126

HB1313
subdivision (a)(5)(B), "eligible to retire with full retirement benefits"
means a police officer who is:
(a) Any age with twenty-eight (28) years of
credited service;
(b) At least fifty-five (55) years of age and
has at least twenty (20) years of credited service;
(c) At least sixty (60) years of age and has
at least five (5) years of credited service; or
(d) At least sixty (60) years of age and has
at least ten (10) years of actual Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement
System service credit; and
(C) Not eligible for Medicare enrollment;
(6) "Firefighter" means a full-time or part-time paid member of
a fire department or firefighting unit who:
(A) Actively engages in fire suppression, rescue, pump
operation, or other firefighting activity; and
(B) Receives more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) in
total compensation during the taxable year from the fire department or
firefighting unit that the firefighter serves;
(4)(7) "Health benefit plan" means a plan for health benefits
offered by a municipality or county;
(5)(8) "Municipality" means:
(A) A city of the first class;
(B) A city of the second class; or
(C) An incorporated town; and
(6)(9) "Police officer" means:
(A) Any law enforcement officer engaged in official duty
who is a member of any regular or auxiliary police force of a municipality or
county on a full-time or part-time basis;
(B) A sheriff or deputy sheriff of a county who is engaged
in official duty; or
(C) A constable or night marshal of a municipality engaged
in official duty.
(b)(1)(A) An eligible police officer retiree may elect to participate
in a health benefit plan after retirement.
(B) The eligible police officer retiree is eligible under
01/29/2025 12:57:34 PM ANS126

HB1313
subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section until the eligible police officer
retiree is a Medicare-eligible person.
(C)(i) An eligible police officer retiree shall have a
guaranteed issue period of sixty (60) calendar days from the date of
retirement to enroll in the health benefit plan.
(ii) If the eligible police officer retiree does not
elect to participate or declines to participate in the health benefit plan
upon the expiration of sixty (60) calendar days under subdivision
(b)(1)(C)(i) of this section, the eligible police officer retiree has no
further privileges under the health benefit plan.
(2) An eligible police officer retiree who elects to participate
in the health benefit plan shall pay a premium as determined by the
municipality or county or the cost of the policy issued to the eligible
police officer retiree.
(3) The eligible police officer retiree portion of the premium
shall be deducted from a bank account of the eligible police officer retiree
participant, to be paid by a monthly bank draft on the date designated by the
municipality or county.
(c) A dependent of an eligible police officer retiree is eligible to
participate in the health benefit plan.
(d) An eligible police officer retiree shall not be charged a
surcharge or assessment to enroll in the health benefit plan.
(e)(1) If an eligible police officer retiree dies and has covered
dependents at the time of death, the dependents have the right to continue to
participate in the health benefit plan through the municipality or county.
(2) Dependent children of a deceased eligible police officer
retiree may continue to participate in the health benefit plan until marriage
or until the maximum age limit for a dependent child has been reached.
(3) A surviving spouse of a deceased eligible police officer
retiree or eligible firefighter retiree may continue to participate in the
health benefit plan.
(4) If a surviving spouse or dependent of a deceased eligible
police officer retiree declines to participate in the health benefit plan or
cancels existing participation, then the surviving spouse or dependent has no
further privileges under the health benefit plan.

01/29/2025 12:57:34 PM ANS126